North Carolina, session 2025, SB968.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Board of Trustees of North Carolina State University (the
Board), in consultation with the College of Veterinary Medicine at North Carolina State
University, shall study the feasibility and advisability of establishing a new college of veterinary
medicine at another institution of higher education located in North Carolina. The Board shall
report the results of its study to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later
than March 15, 2027. As part of its study, the Board shall consider at least the following:
(1) The need for additional veterinarians in this State, including veterinarians who
specialize in treating large animals.
(2) The costs and benefits of establishing a new college of veterinary medicine at
another institution of higher education located in North Carolina, including
the extent to which an additional college of veterinary medicine would help
the State retain high-achieving residents who pursue careers as veterinarians.
(3) A suitable location for the new college of veterinary medicine, including the
following:
a. An appropriate institution of higher education to house the college.
b. Locations in the State that would be appropriate for providing
instruction on the treatment of large animals.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to North Carolina
State University to conduct the study described in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S968-v-1*